Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB757.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1330(b)(1) introductory paragraph of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1330. Alternative ratemaking for utilities.* * *(b) Alternative rate mechanisms.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, sections 2806.1(k)(2) (relating to energy efficiency and conservation program) and 2807(f)(4) (relating to duties of electric distribution companies and electric distribution suppliers), the 12345678910111213141516171819 commission may approve an application by a utility in a base rate proceeding to establish alternative rates and rate mechanisms, including, but not limited to, the following mechanisms:* * *Section 2. Section 2206 of Title 66 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2206. Consumer protections and customer service.* * *(g) Limitations on in-person sales of natural gas.--(1) A natural gas supplier engaged in the sale of natural gas in person, including the sale of natural gas door-to-door or in any other public venue, shall have the following duties:(i) Engage in the in-person sale of natural gas only during the hours of 9 a.m. until 5 p.m., Monday through Saturday.(ii) Provide a retail gas customer with an affirmative notice of the retail gas customer's option to verify a solicitation activity by furnishing the retail gas customer's phone number to the natural gas supplier and the n atural gas distribution company. (2) Unless initiated by a retail gas customer, a natural gas supplier engaged in the sale of natural gas in person, including the sale of natural gas door-to-door or in any other public venue, may not enter into a contract with the retail gas customer for natural gas supply services at an initial meeting between the natural gas supplier and the retail gas customer. The execution of a contract specified under this paragraph must occur at a location mutually agreed 20250HB0757PN0781 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to by the natural gas supplier and the retail gas customer, including the retail gas customer's home, the natural gas supplier's place of business or any other agreed-to location, after the initial meeting between the natural gas supplier and the retail gas customer . (3) The requirements under this subsection shall be in addition to and, when applicable, supersede the orders and regulations of the commission.Section 3. Section 2807 heading of Title 66 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2807. Duties of electric distribution companies and electric distribution suppliers.* * *(d.1) Limitations on in-person sales of electric power.--(1) An electricity supplier engaged in the sale of electric power in person, including the sale of electric power door-to-door or in any other public venue, shall have the following duties:(i) Engage in the in-person sale of electric power only during the hours of 9 a.m. until 5 p.m., Monday through Saturday.(ii) Provide a customer with an affirmative notice of the customer's option to verify a solicitation activity by furnishing the customer's phone number to the electricity supplier and the electric distribution company.(2) Unless initiated by a customer, an electricity supplier engaged in the sale of electric power in person, including the sale of electric power door-to-door or in any other public venue, may not enter into a contract with the 20250HB0757PN0781 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 customer for electric power services at an initial meeting between the electricity supplier and the customer. The execution of a contract specified under this paragraph must occur at a location mutually agreed to by the electricity supplier and the customer, including the customer's home, the electricity supplier's place of business or any other agreed-to location, after the initial meeting between the electricity supplier and the customer . (3) The requirements under this subsection shall be in addition to and, when applicable, supersede the orders and regulations of the commission.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0757PN0781 - 4 - 12345678910111213